Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that:

(1) The state is projected to experience substantial population growth in the next two decades and this growth will require substantial new housing, places of employment, community facilities, and supporting local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;

(2) In most areas of the state projected to accommodate substantial growth, there are inadequate community facilities and infrastructure to facilitate and support such growth. In addition, current public financing options and resources are not adequate to provide the needed community facilities and local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;

(3) A more flexible type of financing mechanism known as a community facilities district should be available to counties, cities, and towns so that needed community facilities and local, subregional, and regional infrastructure can be provided;

(4) This chapter is intended to facilitate voluntary landowner financing of community facilities and local, subregional, and regional infrastructure by authorizing the creation of community facilities districts, while creating jobs and facilitating economic development; and

(5) It is in the interest of the people of the state of Washington to authorize the establishment of community facility [facilities] districts as independently governed, special purpose districts, vested with the corporate authority included under Article VII, section 9 of the state Constitution to make local improvements in accordance with this chapter and to carry out the purposes specifically authorized under this chapter.

[ 2010 c 7 s 101.]